Utah statutes.
31A-13-107.   Commissioner's remedies.
If the trustees of any employee welfare fund have failed to register the fund
in accordance with Section 31A-13-103, or otherwise fail to comply with this
chapter, the commissioner shall notify the employers of the failure.  In
addition to ordering compliance under Subsection 31A-2-201(4), the
commissioner may:
(1)  order the employers to stop making payments to the trustees until the
employers are notified by the commissioner that the trustees are in compliance
with this chapter; or
(2)  rehabilitate or liquidate the employee welfare fund under Chapter 27a,
Insurer Receivership Act.
